Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1931YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 324 Section 1. Section 236.12, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. As described in subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , âcâ , 3 âdâ , âeâ , or âfâ , the peace officer shall arrest the person 4 whom the peace officer believes to be the primary physical 5 aggressor. The duty of the officer to arrest extends only 6 to those persons involved who are believed to have committed 7 an assault. Persons acting with justification, as defined 8 described in section 704.3 , are not subject to mandatory 9 arrest. In identifying the primary physical aggressor, a peace 10 officer shall consider the need to protect victims of domestic 11 abuse, the relative degree of injury or fear inflicted on the 12 persons involved, and any history of domestic abuse between 13 the persons involved. A peace officerâs identification of the 14 primary physical aggressor shall not be based on the consent of 15 the victim to any subsequent prosecution or on the relationship 16 of the persons involved in the incident, and shall not be based 17 solely upon the absence of visible indications of injury or 18 impairment. 19 b. If no arrest has been made pursuant to subsection 20 2, paragraph âaâ , the peace officer shall perform a threat 21 evaluation of the person the peace officer believes to be 22 the primary physical aggressor based on rules adopted by the 23 department in accordance with section 236.16, subsection 1, 24 paragraph âfâ . The peace officer shall provide informational 25 materials prepared by the department pursuant to section 26 236.16, subsection 1, paragraph âhâ , to the primary physical 27 aggressor. 28 Sec. 2. Section 236.12, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. Prior to the release of a person 31 arrested under subsection 2, the police department or sheriffâs 32 office responsible for the personâs arrest shall perform a 33 threat evaluation of the person based on rules adopted by 34 the department in accordance with section 236.16, subsection 35 -1- LSB 1931YH (5) 91 dg/ko 1/ 7 H.F. 324 1, paragraph âfâ . Upon completion of the threat evaluation, 1 the police department or sheriffâs office shall transmit the 2 threat evaluation to the appropriate judicial department of 3 correctional services. 4 Sec. 3. Section 236.16, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraphs: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. (1) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 7 to create a threat evaluation classification system to evaluate 8 the potential threat a primary physical aggressor identified 9 pursuant to section 236.12, subsection 3, poses to an abused 10 person. Evaluations of threat shall be established based on 11 the following: 12 (a) The number of previous and current domestic abuse 13 assault convictions of the primary physical aggressor. 14 (b) The number of times the primary physical aggressor has 15 violated a temporary, emergency, or protective order issued 16 pursuant to this chapter. 17 (c) Whether the primary physical aggressor has been 18 convicted of a felony. 19 (d) Whether the primary physical aggressor has been 20 convicted of illegally using, carrying, or possessing a 21 dangerous weapon as defined in section 702.7. 22 (e) The number of offenses committed by the primary physical 23 aggressor that occurred in other jurisdictions that are 24 substantially similar to the offenses listed in subparagraph 25 divisions (a) through (d). 26 (2) Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall include 27 but not be limited to a requirement that a peace officer 28 or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to 29 obtain information from other state jurisdictions that may be 30 pertinent in performing a threat evaluation. 31 (3) The factors listed in subparagraph (1), subparagraph 32 divisions (a) through (e), shall be considered a checklist. If 33 a peace officer finds a primary physical aggressor is described 34 by two or more of the factors, the peace officer shall 35 -2- LSB 1931YH (5) 91 dg/ko 2/ 7 H.F. 324 disseminate to the primary physical aggressor informational 1 materials prepared by the department pursuant to section 2 236.16, subsection 1, paragraph âhâ . 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. (1) Prepare, for the purpose of 4 dissemination to a victim of domestic abuse, informational 5 materials intended to address root causes of domestic abuse, 6 deter further domestic abuse, and offer support. Information 7 contained in the materials shall include but not be limited to 8 all of the following: 9 (a) Financial assistance that may be available to a victim 10 and general application information. 11 (b) Mental health services that may be available to a victim 12 and contact information for those services. 13 (c) Victim abuse and rehabilitation services and contact 14 information for those services. 15 (d) Information pertaining to Iowa legal aid and contact 16 information for Iowa legal aid. 17 (e) General information regarding services and benefits 18 that may be available to a victim through the department of 19 health and human services. 20 (2) Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall include 21 but not be limited to a determination of when a victim shall 22 receive materials created pursuant to this paragraph. 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. (1) Prepare, for the purpose of 24 dissemination to a primary physical aggressor identified 25 pursuant to section 236.12, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , 26 informational materials intended to address root causes of 27 domestic abuse and deter further domestic abuse. Information 28 contained in the materials shall include but not be limited to 29 all of the following: 30 (a) Financial assistance that may be available to a primary 31 physical aggressor and general application information. 32 (b) Employment services and work programs that may 33 be available to a primary physical aggressor and contact 34 information for those services and programs. 35 -3- LSB 1931YH (5) 91 dg/ko 3/ 7 H.F. 324 (c) Mental health and substance abuse services that may 1 be available to a primary physical aggressor and a general 2 explanation of how to request those services. 3 (d) Housing assistance that may be available to a primary 4 physical aggressor and general application information. 5 (e) Family counseling services that may be available to a 6 primary physical aggressor and contact information for those 7 services. 8 (f) Community mentoring services that may be available to a 9 primary physical aggressor and contact information for those 10 services. 11 (g) A summary of the consequences a primary physical 12 aggressor may face for violating any temporary, emergency, or 13 protective order issued pursuant to this chapter. 14 (2) Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall include 15 but not be limited to a determination of when a primary 16 physical aggressor shall receive materials created pursuant to 17 this paragraph. 18 Sec. 4. Section 708.2B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person who was arrested pursuant to 21 section 236.12, subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , shall report to a 22 district department upon the personâs release, at which time 23 the district department shall provide materials prepared by the 24 department of justice pursuant to section 236.16, subsection 1, 25 paragraph âhâ , to the person. 26